California, session 20252026, AB1323.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 31521 of the Government Code is amended to read:31521. (a) The board of supervisors may provide that the fourth and fifth members, and in counties having a board consisting of nine members or nine members and an alternate retired member, the fourth, fifth, sixth, eighth, ninth, and alternate retired members, and in counties having a board of investments under Section 31520.2, the fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth, and ninth members of the board of investments, shall receive compensation at a rate of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for a meeting, or for a meeting of a committee authorized by the board, for not more than five meetings per month, together with actual and necessary expenses for all members of the board.(b) The compensation rate limit established by the board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (a) may be increased by the board of retirement to a rate of not more than three hundred twenty dollars ($320). by an amount not to exceed 5 percent of the rate for each calendar year following the operative date of the last adjustment. This subdivision shall apply only in a county of the second class. not be operative in any county until it is adopted by a majority vote of the board of supervisors.SEC. 2.The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances facing Orange County.